Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2658
Nebraska aerial pesticide business
license holder; responsibility; disciplinary actions; hearing.

Each Nebraska aerial
pesticide business license holder is responsible for the acts of each person
applying pesticides on lands within this state under the direction and supervision
of the business. The aerial pesticide business's license is subject to denial,
suspension, modification, or revocation after a hearing for any violation
of the Pesticide Act, whether committed by the license holder, the license
holder's agent, or the license holder's employee.

Laws 2010, LB254, § 5.